lexica/pronouns_rules.lexc
LEXICON PronPersonal

+Pronoun+Personal:@P.STEM_BOUND_PRONOUN.Y@ BoundPersonalEndings;

LEXICON BoundPersonalEndings

+First+NoGender+Sing+Acc+BoundClitic:^me #;
+Second+NoGender+Sing+Acc+BoundClitic:^te #;
+Third+Masc+Sing+Acc+BoundClitic:^nj$ #;
+Third+Masc+Dual+Acc+BoundClitic:^nju #;
+Third+Masc+Plural+Acc+BoundClitic:^nje #;
+Third+Fem+Sing+Acc+BoundClitic:^njo #;
+Third+Fem+Dual+Acc+BoundClitic:^nju #;
+Third+Fem+Plural+Acc+BoundClitic:^nje #;
+Third+Neut+Sing+Acc+BoundClitic:^nj$ #;
+Third+Neut+Dual+Acc+BoundClitic:^nju #;
+Third+Neut+Plural+Acc+BoundClitic:^nje #;

LEXICON Pronoun

!Personal pronouns here

jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Nom:jaz #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Gen:mene #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Gen+Clitic:me #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Dat:meni #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Dat+Clitic:mi #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Acc:mene #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Acc+Clitic:me #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Loc:meni #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Ins:mano #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Sing+Ins:menoj #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+Masc+Dual+Nom:midva #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+Fem+Dual+Nom:midve #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+Fem+Dual+Nom:medve #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Dual+Gen:naju #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Dual+Dat:nama #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Dual+Acc:naju #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Dual+Loc:naju #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Dual+Loc:nama #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Dual+Ins:nama #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+Masc+Plural+Nom:mi #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+Fem+Plural+Nom:me #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Plural+Gen:nas #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Plural+Dat:nam #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Plural+Acc:nas #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Plural+Loc:nas #;
jaz+Pronoun+Personal+First+NoGender+Plural+Ins:nami #;

ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Nom:ti #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Gen:tebe #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Gen+Clitic:te #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Dat:tebi #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Dat+Clitic:ti #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Acc:tebe #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Acc+Clitic:te #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Loc:tebi #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Ins:tabo #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Sing+Ins:teboj #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+Masc+Dual+Nom:vidva #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+Fem+Dual+Nom:vidve #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+Fem+Dual+Nom:vedve #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+Neut+Dual+Nom:vidva #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Dual+Gen:vaju #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Dual+Dat:vama #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Dual+Acc:vaju #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Dual+Loc:vaju #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Dual+Loc:vama #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Dual+Ins:vama #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+Masc+Plural+Nom:vi #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+Fem+Plural+Nom:ve #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+Neut+Plural+Nom:vi #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Plural+Gen:vas #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Plural+Dat:vam #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Plural+Acc:vas #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Plural+Loc:vas #;
ti+Pronoun+Personal+Second+NoGender+Plural+Ins:vami #;

on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Nom:on #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Gen:njega #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Gen+Clitic:ga #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Dat:njemu #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Dat+Clitic:mu #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Acc:njega #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Acc+Clitic:ga #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Loc:njem #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Sing+Ins:njim #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Nom:onadva #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Gen:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Gen:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Gen+Clitic:ju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Gen+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Dat:njima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Dat+Clitic:jima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Acc:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Acc+Clitic:ju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Acc+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Loc:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Dual+Ins:njima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Nom:oni #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Gen:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Gen+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Dat:njim #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Dat+Clitic:jim #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Acc:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Acc:nje #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Acc+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Loc:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Masc+Plural+Ins:njimi #;

on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Nom:ona #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Gen:nje #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Gen+Clitic:je #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Dat:njej #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Dat:nji #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Dat+Clitic:ji #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Acc:njo #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Acc+Clitic:jo #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Loc:njej #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Loc:nji #;
!on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Loc:nji #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Sing+Ins:njo #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Nom:onedve #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Nom:onidve #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Gen:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Gen:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Gen+Clitic:ju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Gen+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Dat:njima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Dat+Clitic:jima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Acc:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Acc+Clitic:ju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Acc+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Loc:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Loc:njima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Dual+Ins:njima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Nom:one #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Gen:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Gen+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Dat:njim #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Dat+Clitic:jim #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Acc:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Acc:nje #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Acc+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Loc:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Fem+Plural+Ins:njimi #;

on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Nom:ono #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Gen:njega #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Gen+Clitic:ga #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Dat:njemu #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Dat+Clitic:mu #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Acc:ono #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Acc+Clitic:ga #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Loc:njem #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Sing+Ins:njim #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Nom:onedve #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Nom:onidve #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Gen:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Gen:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Gen+Clitic:ju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Gen+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Dat:njima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Dat+Clitic:jima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Acc:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Acc+Clitic:ju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Acc+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Loc:njiju #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Loc:njima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Dual+Ins:njima #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Nom:ona #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Gen:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Gen+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Dat:njim #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Dat+Clitic:jim #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Acc:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Acc:nje #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Acc+Clitic:jih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Loc:njih #;
on+Pronoun+Personal+Third+Neut+Plural+Ins:njimi #;

!Possessive pronouns here

moj+Pronoun+Possessive+First+OwnerSing:moj AdjNoDefiniteness;
najin+Pronoun+Possessive+First+OwnerDual:najin AdjNoDefiniteness;
naš+Pronoun+Possessive+First+OwnerPlural:naš AdjNoDefiniteness;
tvoj+Pronoun+Possessive+Second+OwnerSing:tvoj AdjNoDefiniteness;
vajin+Pronoun+Possessive+Second+OwnerDual:vajin AdjNoDefiniteness;
vaš+Pronoun+Possessive+Second+OwnerPlural:vaš AdjNoDefiniteness;
njegov+Pronoun+Possessive+Third+OwnerSing+OwnerMasc:njegov AdjNoDefiniteness;
njen+Pronoun+Possessive+Third+OwnerSing+OwnerFem:njen AdjNoDefiniteness;
njegov+Pronoun+Possessive+Third+OwnerSing+OwnerNeut:njegov AdjNoDefiniteness;
njun+Pronoun+Possessive+Third+OwnerDual:njun AdjNoDefiniteness;
njihen+Pronoun+Possessive+Third+OwnerPlural:njihen@P.FLEETING.REPLACE@ AdjNoDefiniteness;
njihnji+Pronoun+Possessive+Third+OwnerPlural:njihnji@P.STEM_PRONOUN.Y@ AdjNoDefiniteness;
njihov+Pronoun+Possessive+Third+OwnerPlural:njihov AdjNoDefiniteness;

LEXICON PronDemon

+Pronoun+Demonstrative+NoPerson:@P.STEM_PRONOUN.Y@ AdjNoDefiniteness;

LEXICON PronRel

+Pronoun+Relative+NoPerson:@P.STEM_PRONOUN.Y@ AdjNoDefiniteness;
+Pronoun+Relative+NoPerson+Neut+Sing+Acc:@P.STEM_PRONOUN.Y@^ega #;

LEXICON Pronoun

! Reflexive pronouns here

svoj+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson:svoj AdjNoDefiniteness;
se+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+NoCase+Clitic:se #;
se+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+Gen:sebe #;
se+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+Dat:sebi #;
se+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+Dat+Clitic:si #;
se+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+Acc:sebe #;
se+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+Loc:sebi #;
se+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+Ins:seboj #;
se+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+Ins:sabo #;

LEXICON PronBoundRefl

+Pronoun+Reflexive+NoPerson+NoGender+NoNumber+Acc+BoundClitic: #;

LEXICON PronGen

+Pronoun+General+NoPerson:@P.STEM_PRONOUN.Y@ AdjNoDefiniteness;

LEXICON Pronoun

! We need to special case this one, and for some reason I couldn't get the
! fleeting vowel replacement to work, so we're just hard coding this.
obojen+Pronoun+General+NoPerson:obojen@P.FLEETING.REPLACE@ AdjNoDefiniteness;

LEXICON PronInterr

+Pronoun+Interrogative+NoPerson:@P.STEM_PRONOUN.Y@ AdjNoDefiniteness;

LEXICON PronIndef

+Pronoun+IndefinitePronoun+NoPerson:@P.STEM_PRONOUN.Y@ AdjNoDefiniteness;

LEXICON PronNeg

+Pronoun+NegativePronoun+NoPerson:@P.STEM_PRONOUN.Y@ AdjNoDefiniteness;
